Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1222, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2e. new text end new text begin Private residential pool used for certified swimming classes. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, part 4717.0250, subpart 7, a private residential swimming pool may be used as part of a business if the private residential pool is used by a paying guest of the homeowner and the guest is participating in a certified swimming class conducted by the homeowner, provided that: new text end new text begin (1) the homeowner is a certified swimming instructor and is conducting a certified swimming class on a one-on-one basis; and new text end new text begin (2) not more than four individuals are in the pool at the same time during the class. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1222, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. (b) "ASME/ANSI standard" means a safety standard accredited by the American National Standards Institute and published by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers. (c) "ASTM standard" means a safety standard issued by ASTM International, formerly known as the American Society for Testing and Materials. (d) "Public pool" means any pool other than a private residential pool, that is: (1) open to the public generally, whether for a fee or free of charge; (2) open exclusively to members of an organization and their guests; (3) open to residents of a multiunit apartment building, apartment complex, residential real estate development, or other multifamily residential area; (4) open to patrons of a hotel or lodging or other public accommodation facility; or (5) operated by a person in a park, school, licensed child care facility, group home, motel, camp, resort, club, condominium, manufactured home park, or political subdivision with the exception of swimming pools at family day care homes licensed under section 142B.41, subdivision 9, paragraph (a). (e) "Unblockable suction outlet or drain" means a drain of any size and shape that a human body cannot sufficiently block to create a suction entrapment hazard and meets ASME/ANSI standards. new text begin (f) "Certified swimming class" means an infant swimming resource (ISR) class; an American Red Cross swimming class, swimming lesson, or learn-to-swim class; and any other swimming class certified by a nationally accredited organization that operates in all 50 states. new text end new text begin (g) "Certified swimming instructor" means a certified ISR instructor; a certified American Red Cross swimming instructor or swim coach; and any other swim instructor certified by a nationally accredited organization that operates in all 50 states. new text end